Utah, session 2026, SB24.
Section 1. Section 63I-1-258 is amended to read:63I-1-258. Repeal dates: Title 58.(1)Title 58, Chapter 13, Health Care Providers Immunity from Liability Act, is repealed July 1, 20262036.(2)Title 58, Chapter 15, Health Facility Administrator Act, is repealed July 1, 2035.(3)Title 58, Chapter 20b, Environmental Health Scientist Act, is repealed July 1, 2028.(4)Section 58-37-3.5, Drugs for behavioral health treatment, is repealed July 1, 2027.(5)Subsection 58-37-6(7)(f)(iii), regarding a seven-day opiate supply restriction, is repealed July 1, 2032.(6)Title 58, Chapter 40, Recreational Therapy Practice Act, is repealed July 1, 2033.(7)Title 58, Chapter 41, Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology Licensing Act, is repealed July 1, 2029.(8)Title 58, Chapter 46a, Hearing Instrument Specialist Licensing Act, is repealed July 1, 2033.(9)Title 58, Chapter 47b, Massage Therapy Practice Act, is repealed July 1, 2034.(10)Subsection 58-47b-102(8), defining massage assistant, is repealed July 1, 2029.(11)Subsection 58-47b-102(9), defining massage assistant-in-training, is repealed July 1, 2029.(12)Subsection 58-47b-302(1), regarding applicant for a massage assistant-in-training, is repealed July 1, 2029.(13)Subsection 58-47b-302(2), regarding applicant for a massage assistant, is repealed July 1, 2029.(14)Subsection 58-47b-303(3)(b), regarding expiration of a massage assistant-in-training license, is repealed July 1, 2029.(15)Subsection 58-55-201(2), regarding the Alarm System and Security Licensing Advisory Board, is repealed July 1, 2027.(16)Title 58, Chapter 61, Part 7, Behavior Analyst Licensing Act, is repealed July 1, 2026.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.